Washington statutes.
RCW 15.04.150

Berry harvesting by youthful workers—Legislative finding.

The legislature finds that the crops of berry growers in the state are imperiled by a recent change in the federal law relating to youthful agricultural workers. Since the berry harvest season is so short that few migrant agricultural workers find the trip to this state to pick berries worth the trouble, the long-established use of younger pickers must be permitted to the extent where such employment will not interfere with interstate commerce and the federal law. Further, the legislature finds that such employment is healthful, a good indoctrination for youth in the work ethic and the role of agriculture in society, and an opportunity youths welcome to earn extra spending money.

[ 1975 1st ex.s. c 238 s 1.]